Hawaii, session 2026, SB1024.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 356D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§356D-    Pet animals.  (a)  The authority shall allow any resident of a public housing project or state low-income housing project to keep one or more pet animals in the resident's unit, subject to applicable state laws, county ordinances, and any reasonable conditions. (b)  The authority may charge a refundable deposit for each pet animal but shall not impose a monthly pet fee or pet rent. (c) Nothing in this section shall prevent the authority from immediately acting to remove a vicious animal to protect persons or property. (d)  For purposes of this section: "Pet animal" has the same meaning as defined in section 711-1100. "Reasonable conditions" include: (1)  Policies on nuisance behaviors; (2)  Leash requirements; (3)  Insurance coverage requirements; (4)  Policies on the maximum number of pet animals allowed, based on the unit's size; and (5)  Bans on specific dogs that a county law enforcement agency has deemed dangerous or vicious; provided that reasonable conditions shall not include bans on entire dog breeds or limitations on a pet animal's size." SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of two full-time equivalent (2.0 FTE) positions to enforce section 1 of this Act and to maintain state public housing properties statewide. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii public housing authority for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________